src/pronoun-sjd-lex.txt
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no


LEXICON Pronoun 

Personal ;
Demonstrative ;
Interrogative ;
Relative ;
Reflexive ;


! Personal pronouns
! =================
! a = stem му-
! b = stem      то̄-, со̄-
! c = stem      тo-, сo-
! d = stem мы-, ты-, сы-
! e = stem мӣ-, тӣ-, сӣ-

LEXICON Personal
мунн:му  pers_a ;
то̄нн:то̄  pers_b ;
со̄нн:со̄  pers_b ;
мунн:мы  pers_c ;
то̄нн:то  pers_d ;
со̄нн:со  pers_d ;
мунн:мы  pers_e ;
то̄нн:ты  pers_e ;
со̄нн:сы  pers_e ;
мунн:мӣ  pers_f ;
то̄нн:тӣ  pers_f ;
со̄нн:сӣ  pers_f ;

LEXICON pers_a
+Pron+Pers+Sg+Nom:нн K ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg+Gen:н K ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg+Acc:н K ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg+Loc:нэсьт K ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg+Com:нэнѣ K ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg+Abess:нха K ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ess:ннэнѣ K ;

LEXICON pers_b
+Pron+Pers+Sg+Nom:нн K ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg+Gen:н K ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg+Acc:н K ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg+Loc:нэсьт K ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg+Com:нэнѣ K ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg+Abess:нха K ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ess:ннэнѣ K ;

LEXICON pers_c
+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ill:ннӭ K ;

LEXICON pers_d
+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ill:ннӭ K ;

LEXICON pers_e
+Pron+Pers+Pl+Nom:йй K ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl+Ill:йе K ;

LEXICON pers_f
+Pron+Pers+Pl+Gen:н K ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl+Acc:нэтѣ K ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl+Loc:нэнѣ K ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl+Com:нэгуэйм K ;
+Pron+Pers+Pl+Abess:нэха K ; 
+Pron+Pers+Pl+Ess:ннэнѣ K ;

LEXICON Demonstrative
тэдта:тэ dem ;

LEXICON dem
+Pron+Dem+Sg+Nom:дта # ;
+Pron+Dem+Sg+Gen:нн # ;
+Pron+Dem+Sg+Acc:нн # ;
+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ill:з # ;
+Pron+Dem+Sg+Loc:сьт # ;
+Pron+Dem+Sg+Com:йн # ;
+Pron+Dem+Sg+Abess:ннха # ;
+Pron+Dem+Pl+Nom:гка # ;
+Pron+Dem+Pl+Gen:йт # ;
+Pron+Dem+Pl+Acc:йт # ;
+Pron+Dem+Pl+Ill:йт # ;
+Pron+Dem+Pl+Loc:йнэнҍ # ;
+Pron+Dem+Pl+Com:йтгуэйм # ;
+Pron+Dem+Pl+Abess:йтха # ;

! Interrogative pronouns
! ======================
! a	= stem ке̄- 
! b = stem мӣ- 
! c = stem мӣ- -> мэ̄-
! d = stem мӣ- -> ма̄-

LEXICON Interrogative
ке̄:ке̄ interr_a ;
мӣ:мӣ interr_b ;
мӣ:мэ̄ interr_c ;
мӣ:ма̄ interr_d ;

LEXICON interr_a
+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom: # ;
+Pron+Interr+Sg+Gen:нн # ;
+Pron+Interr+Sg+Acc:нн # ;
+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ill:з # ;
+Pron+Interr+Sg+Loc:сьт # ;
+Pron+Interr+Sg+Com:йн # ;
+Pron+Interr+Sg+Abess:ннха # ;
+Pron+Interr+Pl+Nom:гк # ;
+Pron+Interr+Pl+Gen:йт # ;
+Pron+Interr+Pl+Acc:йт # ;
+Pron+Interr+Pl+Ill:йт # ;
+Pron+Interr+Pl+Loc:йн # ;
+Pron+Interr+Pl+Com:йтгуэйм # ;
+Pron+Interr+Pl+Abess:йтха # ;

LEXICON interr_b
+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom: # ;

LEXICON interr_c
+Pron+Interr+Sg+Gen:нн # ;
+Pron+Interr+Sg+Acc:нн # ;
+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ill:з # ;
+Pron+Interr+Sg+Com:йн # ;
+Pron+Interr+Sg+Abess:ннха # ;
+Pron+Interr+Pl+Nom:гк # ;
+Pron+Interr+Pl+Gen:йт # ;
+Pron+Interr+Pl+Acc:йт # ;
+Pron+Interr+Pl+Ill:йт # ;
+Pron+Interr+Pl+Loc:йн # ;
+Pron+Interr+Pl+Com:йтгуэйм # ;
+Pron+Interr+Pl+Abess:йтха # ;

LEXICON interr_d
+Pron+Interr+Sg+Loc:сьт # ;

! Relative pronoun
! =================
! a = stem кӯ-
! b = stem кӯ- -> ко̄-

LEXICON Relative
кӯ:кӯ rel_a ;
кӯ:ко̄  rel_b ;

LEXICON rel_a
+Pron+Rel+Sg+Nom: # ;

LEXICON rel_b
+Pron+Rel+Sg+Gen:нн # ;
+Pron+Rel+Sg+Acc:нн # ;
+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ill:з # ;
+Pron+Rel+Sg+Loc:ннэсьт # ;
+Pron+Rel+Sg+Com:йн # ;
+Pron+Rel+Sg+Abess:ннха # ;
+Pron+Rel+Pl+Nom:гк # ;
+Pron+Rel+Pl+Gen:йт # ;
+Pron+Rel+Pl+Acc:йт # ;
+Pron+Rel+Pl+Ill:йт # ;
+Pron+Rel+Pl+Loc:йн # ;
+Pron+Rel+Pl+Com:йтгуэйм # ;
+Pron+Rel+Pl+Abess:йтха # ;

LEXICON Reflexive
ӣджь+Pron+Refl:ӣджь STRONGREFL ;
ӣджь+Pron+Refl:ӣжь WEAKREFL ;

LEXICON STRONGREFL
+Pron+Refl+Sg+Nom: # ;
+Pron+Refl+Ess:%>на PERSREFLSG ;
+Pron+Refl+Ess:%>ена PERSREFLPL ;  
+Pron+Refl+Ill:%>с PERSREFLSG ;
 
LEXICON WEAKREFL 
+Pron+Refl+Pl+Nom:%>а # ;
+Pron+Refl+Gen: PERSREFLSG ;
+Pron+Refl+Acc: PERSREFLSG ;
+Pron+Refl+Loc:%>с PERSREFLSG ;
+Pron+Refl+Com:%>ен PERSREFLSG ;
+Pron+Refl+Abess: PERSREFLSGABESS ;

+Pron+Refl+Gen:%>ед PERSREFLPL ;
+Pron+Refl+Acc:%>ед PERSREFLPL ;
+Pron+Refl+Loc:%>ес PERSREFLPL ;
+Pron+Refl+Com:%>ед PERSREFLPLCOM ;
+Pron+Refl+Abess:%>ед PERSREFLPLABESS ;

LEXICON PERSREFLSG
+Pron+Refl+Sg1:%>aн # ;
+Pron+Refl+Sg2:%>aнт # ;
+Pron+Refl+Sg3:%>есь # ;

LEXICON PERSREFLPL
+Pron+Refl+Pl1:%>ан # ;
+Pron+Refl+Pl2:%>ант # ;
+Pron+Refl+Pl3:%>есь # ;

LEXICON PERSREFLSGABESS
+Pron+Refl+Sg1:%>aнха # ;
+Pron+Refl+Sg2:%>aнтха # ;
+Pron+Refl+Sg3:%>есьха # ;

LEXICON PERSREFLPLABESS
+Pron+Refl+Pl1:%>анха # ;
+Pron+Refl+Pl2:%>антха # ;
+Pron+Refl+Pl3:%>есьха # ;

LEXICON PERSREFLPLCOM
+Pron+Refl+Pl1:%>ангуэйм # ;
+Pron+Refl+Pl2:%>антгуэйм # ;
+Pron+Refl+Pl3:%>есьгуэйм # ;
